District of Columbia statutes.
50-2606

Records and data available; additional surveys.

The National Capital Planning Commission and the Highway Planning Survey Unit shall make available such records and factual data and make such additional surveys as the Mayor may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

History

Feb. 16, 1942, 56 Stat. 93, ch. 76, § 6
Sept. 26, 1980, D.C. Law 3-108, § 3(a), 27 DCR 3781
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-175, § 4(d), 53 DCR 6499

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-808.
1973 Ed., § 40-807.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-175 deleted “or the Agency” following “Mayor”.

Editor's Notes

Motor Vehicle Parking Agency abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-2604.